en: World Beer Awards
xx: World Beer Awards
zh: 世界啤酒奖

en: World Beer Awards 2023
xx: World Beer Awards 2023
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2023
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2023
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2023

en: World Beer Awards 2022
xx: World Beer Awards 2022
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2022
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2022
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2022

en: World Beer Awards 2021
xx: World Beer Awards 2021
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2021
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2021
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2021

en: World Beer Awards 2020
xx: World Beer Awards 2020
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2020
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2020
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2020

en: World Beer Awards 2019
xx: World Beer Awards 2019
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2019
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2019
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2019

en: World Beer Awards 2018
xx: World Beer Awards 2018
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2018
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2018
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2018

en: World Beer Awards 2017
xx: World Beer Awards 2017
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2017
he: פרסי הבירה העולמיים 2017
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2017

en: World Beer Awards 2016
xx: World Beer Awards 2016
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2016

en: World Beer Awards 2015
xx: World Beer Awards 2015
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2015

en: World Beer Awards 2014
xx: World Beer Awards 2014
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2014

en: World Beer Awards 2013
xx: World Beer Awards 2013
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2013

en: World Beer Awards 2012
xx: World Beer Awards 2012
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2012

en: World Beer Awards 2011
xx: World Beer Awards 2011
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2011
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2011

en: World Beer Awards 2010
xx: World Beer Awards 2010
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2010

en: World Beer Awards 2009
xx: World Beer Awards 2009
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2009
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2009

en: World Beer Awards 2008
xx: World Beer Awards 2008
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2008
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2008

en: World Beer Awards 2007
xx: World Beer Awards 2007
ca: Millors Cerveses del Món 2007
zh: 世界啤酒奖 2007

en: Australian International Beer Awards
zh: 澳大利亚国际啤酒奖

en: Brazilian Beer Awards
zh: 巴西啤酒奖